bg-BG: Материал на мембраната на ръчния барабан: Рибешка кожа; Естествена телешка кожа; Естествена козя кожа; Естествена овча кожа; Синтетична (фибърскин); Синтетична (майлар); Други
pt-PT: material da pele do tambor de mão: Pele de peixe; Pele de bezerro natural; Pele de cabra natural; Pele de ovelha natural; Sintética (fiberskin); Sintética (mylar); Outro
hu: Kézi dobfej anyaga: Hal bőr; Természetes borjúbőr; Természetes kecskebőr; Természetes báránybőr; Szintetikus (fiberskin); Szintetikus (mylar); Egyéb
sv: Material för handtrumskinn: Fiskskinn; Naturligt kalvskinn; Naturligt getskinn; Naturligt fårskinn; Syntetiskt (fiberskin); Syntetiskt (mylar); Övrigt
vi: Chất liệu mặt trống tay: Da cá; Da bê tự nhiên; Da dê tự nhiên; Da cừu tự nhiên; Sợi tổng hợp (fiberskin); Sợi tổng hợp (mylar); Khác
tr: El davulu deri malzemesi: Balık derisi; Doğal dana derisi; Doğal keçi derisi; Doğal koyun derisi; Sentetik (fiberskin); Sentetik (mylar); Diğer
th: วัสดุหน้ากลองของกลองมือ: หนังปลา; หนังลูกวัวแท้; หนังแพะแท้; หนังแกะแท้; หนังสังเคราะห์ (Fiberskin); หนังสังเคราะห์ (Mylar); อื่นๆ
en: Hand drum head material: Fish skin; Natural calfskin; Natural goatskin; Natural sheepskin; Synthetic (fiberskin); Synthetic (mylar); Other
de: Material des Handtrommelfells: Fischhaut; Naturkalbsleder; Naturziegenleder; Naturschaffell; Synthetisch (Fiberskyn); Synthetisch (Mylar); Sonstige
ja: ハンドドラムのヘッド素材: 魚皮; 天然カーフスキン; 天然ゴートスキン; 天然シープスキン; 合成素材 (ファイバースキン); 合成素材 (マイラー); その他
fi: Käsirumpukalvon materiaali: Kalan nahka; Aito vasikannahka; Aito vuohennahka; Aito lampaannahka; Synteettinen (kuitukalvo); Synteettinen (Mylar); Muu
cs: Materiál blány ručního bubínku: Rybí kůže; Přírodní telecí kůže; Přírodní kozí kůže; Přírodní ovčí kůže; Syntetika (fiberskin); Syntetika (mylar); Jiný
sl-SI: Material opne ročnega bobna: Ribja koža; Naravna telečja koža; Naravna kozja koža; Naravna ovčja koža; Sintetično (fiberskin); Sintetično (mylar); Drugo
ro-RO: Materialul membranei tobei de mână: Piele de pește; Piele naturală de vițel; Piele naturală de capră; Piele naturală de oaie; Sintetic (Fiberskyn); Sintetic (Mylar); Altele
lt-LT: Rankinio būgno membranos medžiaga: Žuvies oda; Natūrali veršiuko oda; Natūrali ožkos oda; Natūrali avies oda; Sintetinė („Fiberskin“); Sintetinė (milaras); Kita
hr-HR: Materijal membrane za ručni bubanj: Riblja koža; Prirodna teleća koža; Prirodna kozja koža; Prirodna ovčja koža; Sintetička (fiberskin); Sintetička (mylar); Ostalo
ru: Материал мембраны ручного барабана: Рыбья кожа; Натуральная телячья кожа; Натуральная козья кожа; Натуральная овечья кожа; Синтетика (fiberskin); Синтетика (майлар); Другое
ko: 핸드 드럼 헤드 재질: 물고기 가죽; 천연 송아지 가죽; 천연 염소 가죽; 천연 양가죽; 합성(파이버스킨); 합성(마일라); 기타
nl: Handtrommel vel materiaal: Vissenhuid; Natuurlijk kalfsleer; Natuurlijk geitenleer; Natuurlijk schapenleer; Synthetisch (fiberskin); Synthetisch (mylar); Overig
es: Material para parches de tambores de mano: Piel de pescado; Piel de becerro natural; Piel de cabra natural; Piel de oveja natural; Sintético (fiberskin); Sintético (mylar); Otro
el: Υλικό μεμβράνης τυμπάνου χειρός: Δέρμα ψαριού; Φυσικό δέρμα μοσχαριού; Φυσικό δέρμα κατσίκας; Φυσικό δέρμα προβάτου; Συνθετικό (fiberskin); Συνθετικό (mylar); Άλλο
da: Materiale i trommeskind på håndtromme: Fiskeskind; Naturligt kalveskind; Naturligt gedeskind; Naturligt fåreskind; Syntetisk (fiberskind); Syntetisk (mylar); Andet
nb: Materiale for håndtrommeskinn: Fiskeskinn; Naturlig kalveskinn; Naturlig geiteskinn; Naturlig saueskinn; Syntetisk (fiberskinn); Syntetisk (Mylar); Annet
sk-SK: Materiál blany ručného bubna: Rybia koža; Prírodná teľacia koža; Prírodná kozia koža; Prírodná ovčia koža; Syntetická koža (fiberskin); Syntetická koža (mylar); Iné
pl: Materiał membrany bębna ręcznego: Skóra rybia; Naturalna skóra cielęca; Naturalna skóra kozia; Naturalna skóra owcza; Syntetyczna (fiberskin); Syntetyczna (mylar); Inne
it: Materiale della pelle dei tamburi a mano: Pelle di pesce; Pelle di vitello naturale; Pelle di capra naturale; Pelle di pecora naturale; Sintetico (fiberskin); Sintetico (mylar); Altro
fr: Matériau de la peau du tambour à main: Peau de poisson; Peau de veau naturelle; Peau de chèvre naturelle; Peau de mouton naturelle; Synthétique (fiberskin); Synthétique (mylar); Autre
pt-BR: Tambor de mão pele material: Pele de peixe; Pele natural de bezerro; Pele natural de cabra; Pele natural de ovelha; Sintética (fiberskin); Sintética (mylar); Outro
zh-TW: 手鼓鼓皮材質: 魚皮; 天然小牛皮; 天然山羊皮; 天然羊皮; 合成材質 (仿獸皮); 合成材質 (聚酯薄膜); 其他
zh-CN: 手鼓鼓面材质: 鱼皮; 天然小牛皮; 天然山羊皮; 天然绵羊皮; 合成（纤维皮）; 合成（聚酯薄膜）; 其他